Illinois, session 104th, HB2549.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Right 5to Repair Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Antenna" includes, but is not limited to, a resonant 8device designed especially for the purpose of capturing 9electromagnetic energy transmitted by direct satellite or 10commercial radio or television broadcasting facilities. An 11antenna and its associated accessories are not deemed to be a 12part of an electronic set and shall be considered to be located 13outside or in the attic of a residence.14    "Appliance" or "major home appliance" includes, but is not 15limited to, any refrigerator, freezer, range, microwave oven, 16washer, dryer, dishwasher, trash compactor, or room 17air-conditioner normally used or sold for personal, family, 18household, or home office use, or for use in private motor 19vehicles.20    "Authorized repair provider" means an individual or 21business who is unaffiliated with a manufacturer and who has 22an arrangement with the manufacturer under which the 23manufacturer grants to the individual or business a license to   HB2549- 2 -LRB104 09729 SPS 19795 b1use a trade name, service mark, or other proprietary 2identifier to offer the service of diagnosis, maintenance, or 3repair services for electronic or appliance products under the 4name of the manufacturer, or other arrangement with the 5manufacturer to offer diagnostic, maintenance, or repair 6services for electronic or appliance products on behalf of the 7manufacturer. A manufacturer who offers the service of 8diagnosis, maintenance, or repair services for the 9manufacturer's electronic or appliance products is considered 10an authorized repair provider with respect to the electronic 11or appliance products if the manufacturer does not have an 12arrangement with an unaffiliated individual or business. 13    "Documentation" means manual, diagram, reporting output, 14service code description, schematic, or similar information 15that is provided by a manufacturer to an authorized repair 16provider, or that is for use by the manufacturer if the 17manufacturer does not have any authorized repair providers, 18for purposes of effecting the services of diagnosis, 19maintenance, or repair of the electronic or appliance product.20    "Electronic or appliance product" or "product" means a 21product manufactured for the first time and first sold or used 22in Illinois on or after July 1, 2021, for which the 23manufacturer makes available tools, parts, and documentation 24to authorized repair providers, and includes products that are 25sold to schools, businesses, local governments, or in other 26methods outside of direct retail sale. "Electronic or   HB2549- 3 -LRB104 09729 SPS 19795 b1appliance product" or "product" includes an electronic set, 2appliance or major home appliance, antenna, or rotator.3    "Electronic or appliance product" or "product" does not 4include a product or component of an alarm system, including a 5fire protection system, or a video game console. 6    "Electronic set" includes, but is not limited to, any 7television, radio, audio or video recorder or playback 8equipment, video camera, video game, video monitor, computer 9system, photocopier, or facsimile machine normally used or 10sold for personal, family, household, or home office use.11    "Fair and reasonable terms" means making available parts, 12tools, or documentation as follows: 13        (1) that terms are equivalent to the most favorable 14    costs and terms under which the manufacturer offers the 15    part, tool, or documentation to an authorized repair 16    provider, accounting for any discount, rebate, convenient 17    and timely means of delivery, means of enabling fully 18    restored and updated functionality, rights of use, or 19    other incentive or preference the manufacturer offers to 20    an authorized repair provider; 21        (2) that documentation, including any relevant 22    updates, is made available at no charge, except that, when 23    the documentation is requested in physical printed form, a 24    charge may be included for the reasonable actual costs of 25    preparing and sending the copy; and26        (3) that the tools are made available by the   HB2549- 4 -LRB104 09729 SPS 19795 b1    manufacturer at no charge and without imposing impediments 2    to access or use of the tools to diagnose, maintain, or 3    repair and enable full functionality of the product, or in 4    a manner that impairs the efficient and cost-effective 5    performance of any such diagnosis, maintenance, or repair, 6    except that, when a tool is requested in physical form, a 7    charge may be included for the reasonable, actual costs of 8    preparing and sending the tool.9    If a manufacturer does not use an authorized repair 10provider, "fair and reasonable terms" means at a price that 11reflects the actual cost to the manufacturer to prepare and 12deliver the part, tool, or documentation, exclusive of any 13research and development costs incurred.14    "Part" means any replacement part or assembly of parts, 15either new or used, made available by a manufacturer of an 16electronic or appliance product to an authorized repair 17provider to facilitate the maintenance or repair of a product 18sold by the manufacturer. 19    "Rotator" includes, but is not limited to, when used in 20connection with an antenna installation or repair, an 21electromechanical device operated from a remote location to 22rotate an antenna on a horizontal plane. A rotator and its 23associated accessories are not deemed to be a part of an 24electronic set and shall be considered, with the exception of 25the directional control unit, to be located outside or in the 26attic of a residence.  HB2549- 5 -LRB104 09729 SPS 19795 b1    "Service dealer" means a person who, for compensation, 2engages in, or holds himself or herself out to the public as 3offering services in the business of: 4        (1) repairing, servicing, or maintaining an electronic 5    set normally used or sold for personal, family, household, 6    or home office use; 7        (2) installing, repairing, servicing, or maintaining 8    equipment or a burglar alarm system for use in private 9    motor vehicles; 10        (3) installing, repairing, servicing, or maintaining 11    television or radio receiver antennas, rotators, and 12    accessories or direct satellite signal receiving equipment 13    located on or adjacent to a residence; or14        (4) repairing, servicing, or maintaining major 15    appliances. 16    "Tool" means any software program, hardware implement, or 17other apparatus made available by a manufacturer of an 18electronic or appliance product to an authorized repair 19provider for the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of the 20product, including software or other mechanisms that 21provision, program, pair apart, provide or calibrate 22functionality, or perform any other function required to 23repair the product or part back to fully functional condition, 24including any updates. 25    "Trade secret" has the meaning given to that term in 26subsection (d) of Section 2 of the Illinois Trade Secrets Act.   HB2549- 6 -LRB104 09729 SPS 19795 b1    "Video game console" means a computing device, including 2its components and peripherals, that is primarily used by 3consumers for playing video games, such as a console machine, 4a handheld console device, or another device or system. "Video 5game console" does not include a general or an all-purpose 6computer, which includes, but is not limited to, a desktop 7computer, laptop, tablet, or cell phone. 8    Section 10. Right to repair. 9    (a) Notwithstanding any other law, every manufacturer of 10an electronic or appliance product with a wholesale price or 11direct sales price of more than $50 and less than $100 shall 12make service and repair facilities available to owners of the 13product. The manufacturer shall make available to service and 14repair facilities and service dealers sufficient documentation 15and functional parts and tools, inclusive of any updates, on 16fair and reasonable terms, to effect the diagnosis, 17maintenance, or repair of a product for at least 3 years after 18the last date a product model or type was manufactured, 19regardless of whether the 3-year period exceeds the warranty 20period for the product. 21    (b) Notwithstanding any other law, every manufacturer of 22an electronic or appliance product with a wholesale price or 23direct sales price of $100 or more shall make service and 24repair facilities available to owners of the product. The 25manufacturer shall make available to service and repair   HB2549- 7 -LRB104 09729 SPS 19795 b1facilities and service dealers sufficient documentation and 2functional parts and tools, inclusive of any updates, on fair 3and reasonable terms, to effect the diagnosis, maintenance, or 4repair of a product for at least 7 years after the last date a 5product model or type was manufactured, regardless of whether 6the 7-year period exceeds the warranty period for the product. 7    (c) A service and repair facility or service dealer that 8is not an authorized repair provider of a manufacturer shall 9provide a written notice to any customer seeking repair of an 10electronic or appliance product before the repair facility or 11service dealer repairs the product that informs the customer 12that it is not an authorized repair provider for the product 13and shall disclose if it uses any used replacement parts or 14replacement parts provided by a supplier other than the 15manufacturer of the product. 16    (d) No manufacturer or authorized repair provider shall be 17liable for any damage or injury caused to any electronic or 18appliance product, person, or property that occurs as a result 19of repair, diagnosis, maintenance, or modification performed 20by a service dealer or owner, including, but not limited to, 21any of the following: 22        (1) any indirect, incidental, special, or 23    consequential damages; 24        (2) any loss of data, privacy, or profits; and25        (3) any inability to use or reduced functionality of 26    the electronic or appliance product.   HB2549- 8 -LRB104 09729 SPS 19795 b1    This subsection does not apply to a design defect or 2manufacturing flaw that existed prior to, or independent of, 3the repair, diagnosis, maintenance, or modification performed 4pursuant to this Section. 5    (e) If a manufacturer is considered an authorized repair 6provider, this Section shall not require the manufacturer to 7make available either of the following: 8        (1) documentation or tools that the manufacturer 9    itself uses only to perform, at no cost, diagnostic 10    services through telephone, Internet, chat, email, or 11    other similar means that do not involve the manufacturer 12    physically handling the customer's electronic or appliance 13    product, unless the manufacturer also makes the 14    documentation or tools available to an individual or 15    business that is unaffiliated with the manufacturer; or16        (2) documentation or tools used exclusively for 17    repairs completed by machines that operate on several 18    electronic or appliance products simultaneously, if the 19    manufacturer makes available to owners of the product, 20    service and repair facilities, and service dealers 21    sufficient alternative documentation and tools to effect 22    the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of the electronic or 23    appliance product. 24    (f) This Section does not apply to a manufacturer that 25provides an equivalent or better, readily available 26replacement electronic or appliance product at no charge to   HB2549- 9 -LRB104 09729 SPS 19795 b1the customer.2    (g) Nothing in this Section shall require a manufacturer:3        (1) to divulge a trade secret or license any 4    intellectual property, including copyrights or patents;5        (2) to distribute a product's source code;6        (3) to make available special documentation, tools, 7    and parts that would disable or override anti-theft 8    security measures set by the owner of the product without 9    the owner's authorization; or10        (4) to sell service parts if the service parts are no 11    longer provided by the manufacturer or made available to 12    an authorized repair provider. 13    Section 15. Violations. 14    (a) A unit of local government or the State may bring an 15action in circuit court to impose civil liability on a person 16or entity that knowingly violates this Act, or reasonably 17should have known that it violated this Act, in the amount of 18$1,000 per day for the first violation of this Act, $2,000 per 19day for the second violation, and $5,000 per day for the third 20and subsequent violations. Any action described in this 21subsection shall be commenced within 3 years after the date of 22the alleged violation.23    (b) Any civil penalties collected under subsection (a) 24shall be paid to the office of the unit of local government or 25the Attorney General, whichever brought the action.   HB2549- 10 -LRB104 09729 SPS 19795 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 22026.